Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2902
Legislative power to amend or repeal.

The Legislature shall have the power to amend or repeal all or part of the Nebraska Limited Cooperative Association Act at any time and all domestic and foreign limited cooperative associations subject to the act shall be governed by the amendment or repeal.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 2.